Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 6
PUBLIC HOUSING - ELECTION

29-4-601. Applicability of part 6.

For the purposes of this part 6, there shall be excluded from the term "project" or "housing project" any such project where there is in existence on or after October 1, 1963, a contract for financial assistance between any city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority, and the federal government in respect to such project. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part 6, no vote of the registered electors shall be required in order to make expenditures for preliminary surveys and planning of projects or housing projects, or in order to authorize the reconstruction, replacement, restoration, or remodeling of any project or housing project, or part thereof, which has deteriorated or become damaged or destroyed, from any cause, nor shall such vote be required in order to authorize the acquisition of land for or the construction or erection of such service building, structures, or facilities as may be necessary or convenient for the efficient and proper operation or management of any authorized project or housing project.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 553, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-8-1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 323, § 69, effective July 1.

29-4-602. Posting and publication of notice - petition.

A city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority shall not, on or after October 1, 1963, commence the construction of or acquire by purchase, lease, or otherwise any project, housing project, or addition to an existing project or housing project, unless it first posts notice of such proposed action, specifying the exact nature of the project to be undertaken, in the office of the city clerk of any city or of the county clerk and recorder of any county within which such project is proposed to be located and publishes a copy of such notice once each week for three successive weeks in some daily or weekly newspaper having a general circulation within the area of the city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority within which the project is proposed to be located. If, within thirty days after the posting and the completion of the publication of such notice, a petition, as described in subsection (2) of this section, is filed with the governing body of the city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority proposing such action requesting that the question of the approval or disapproval of the project be first submitted to a vote of the registered electors, such city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority shall not commence the construction of or acquire such project or housing project until a majority of the votes cast by the registered electors of such city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority has been cast in favor of such act at an election called for such purpose pursuant to the provisions of this part 6. If no such petition is filed within said thirty-day period, the authority may proceed with such project.

The petition, one or more copies of which may be submitted and treated as one petition, shall be addressed by name to the city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority proposing such action and shall contain: The identification of the project or action proposed as specified in the notice provided in subsection (1) of this section; a request that the question of the approval or disapproval of such proposed project be submitted to the registered electors of the city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority proposing such action; and the signatures and residence addresses of registered electors of such city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority equal in number to not less than five percent of the votes cast for governor or for president of the United States at the last preceding general election held within such city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority; except that, in cities, cities and counties, authorities, housing authorities, and county housing authorities having a population of more than three hundred thousand persons as determined by the last preceding federal census, only the signatures of registered electors equal in number to three percent of the votes cast at the last preceding general election for governor or president held within such city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority shall be required on said petition in order to require an election as provided in this section.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 554, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-8-2.

L. 65:

p. 729, § 4.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 324, § 70, effective July 1.

29-4-603. Cooperative agreement - costs of election.

When, pursuant to the provisions of this part 6, an election is required in order to authorize an authority or housing authority to construct or acquire a project or housing project, the cooperation agreement between such authority or housing authority and the governing body of the city, city and county, or county from which such cooperation agreement must be obtained shall make provision for the payment of the costs of such election and all cities as defined in article 55 of title 24, C.R.S., and parts 1 and 2 of this article, and cities and counties and counties as defined in part 5 of this article shall have the power to assume and pay for the costs of such election or to lend or donate sufficient money to an authority or housing authority for such purpose.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 555, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-8-3.

29-4-604. Election - resolution.

When, pursuant to the provisions of this part 6, an election of the registered electors of a city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority is required in order to authorize any proposed act, said election may be held either concurrently with any general election held under the laws of the state of Colorado throughout the area of the city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority calling the election or at a special election called for such purpose. The council, board of commissioners, or other governing body of the city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority shall call such election by resolution, which resolution shall:

Specify the objects and purposes of the election, including specifically the particular act which is proposed and which requires the approval of the registered electors;

Specify the day and hours of such election, which day and hours may be the same as those of any concurrent general election;

Provide for the appointment and compensation of judges of election, and if the election is to be held concurrently with a general election, the resolution shall recite that the judges of the concurrent general election shall serve as the judges for the election held in accordance with this part 6 and provide for the additional compensation, if any, which such persons are to receive as judges of the election held in accordance with this part 6;

Designate the precincts and polling places for such election. All precincts and polling places for a concurrent general election which are located within the boundaries of the city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority calling the election under this part 6 shall likewise be designated as the precincts and polling places of the election under this part 6. In the event that a portion of any precinct for the concurrent general election extends beyond the boundaries of the city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority calling the election under this part 6, and in the event that the polling place for such precinct is beyond such boundaries, such polling place may nevertheless be designated as a polling place for the election under this part 6. No judge of the concurrent general election, serving at a polling place so designated as a polling place for the election under this part 6, shall be disqualified from also serving as a judge of this election by reason of the fact that he or she resides in the portion of the precinct which is beyond the boundaries of the city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority calling the election.

Set forth the question to be submitted to the registered electors and the form of the ballot. The question to be submitted shall be worded in a clear and concise manner.

Specify the estimated cost of the proposed construction or acquisition;

Set forth the location of the proposed project, housing project, addition, or improvement.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 555, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-8-4.

L. 87:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(e) amended, p. 325, § 71, effective July 1.

29-4-605. Notice of election.

Upon the adoption of such election resolution, notice of such election shall be given as follows:

By publication of a full copy of the election resolution once each week for three successive weeks in some daily or weekly newspaper having a general circulation within the area of the city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority calling such election, the first publication to be not less than forty-five days nor more than sixty days before the general election at which the question is to be submitted;

By posting or causing to be posted a full copy of the election resolution in each polling place designated as a polling place for such election, which notice shall be posted at all times during the hours that such polls are open for the election;

By having available, at the request of all interested persons, at the principal offices of the city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority, and during regular business hours, full copies of such election resolution.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 556, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-8-5.

29-4-606. Conduct of election.

Said election shall be conducted in all respects in accordance with the general election laws of this state insofar as the same are applicable and not inconsistent with the provisions of this part 6.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 557, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-8-6.

Cross references:

For the general election laws, see article 1 of title 1.

29-4-607. Count of ballots - canvass - results of election.

At the hour designated for closing in the election resolution, the ballot boxes or voting machines in the several polling places shall be closed, the ballots counted, and the returns thereof made to the council, board of commissioners, or other governing body calling the election. At or before the next regular meeting of the council, board of commissioners, or other governing body calling the election, next succeeding the date of such election, such council, board of commissioners, or governing body shall canvass the returns and determine and declare the results of the election, and if a majority of the votes cast at such election have been cast in favor of an act which has been so proposed, the city, city and county, authority, housing authority, or county housing authority shall be deemed to have proper authority to proceed with the same in accordance with the authority so granted, but not otherwise.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 557, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-8-7.